Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.205 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A school district may employ or accept one or more volunteer
chaplains to provide support, services, and programs for students as
assigned by the governing body of the school. A chaplain employed
or volunteering under this act is not required to be certified by
the State Department of Education.
B. A school district may not employ or accept as a volunteer a
chaplain who has been convicted of or is a defendant for an offense
that requires the defendant to register as a sex offender.
Req. No. 10569 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10569 SW 12/16/24





















Req. No. 10569 Page 2